Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4125.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 25-102, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE25-102. Marriage; minimum age A. A person who is at least sixteen years of age and who is under eighteen years of age may marry only if one of the following is true: 1. The person has received an emancipation order pursuant to title 12, chapter 15 or from a court in another state and the person's prospective spouse is not more than three years older than the person. 2. The parent or guardian who has custody of the person consents to the marriage and the person's prospective spouse is not more than three years older than the person. B. Persons who are under sixteen years of age shall not marry. may not marry. C. b. The clerk of the superior court may not issue a license to a person who is under eighteen years of age and who does not meet the requirements of subsection A of this section. END_STATUTE